Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.840

Fumigated conveyances to be labeled.

It shall be unlawful to ship commodities in closed conveyances which have been fumigated without labeling such railroad car, vehicle, or other conveyance to show that it has been fumigated. The label shall show the type of fumigant used and the date of application.

[ 1963 c 124 s 53. Formerly RCW 22.09.530.]